04_Morphology/3kor.twol
Alphabet
ㄱ ㄴ ㄷ ㄹ ㅁ ㅂ ㅅ ㅇ ㅈ ㅊ ㅋ ㅌ ㅍ ㅎ ㅃ ㅉ ㄸ ㄲ ㅆㅏ ㅑ ㅓ ㅕ ㅗ ㅛ ㅜ ㅠ ㅡ ㅣ ㅐ ㅒ ㅔ ㅖ ㅘ ㅙ ㅚ ㅝ ㅞ ㅟ ㅢ
%{이%}:이
%{이%}:가
%{을%}:을
%{을%}:를
%{으로%}:으로
%{으로%}:로
;

Sets

C = ㄱ ㄴ ㄷ ㄹ ㅁ ㅂ ㅅ ㅇ ㅈ ㅊ ㅋ ㅌ ㅍ ㅎ ㅃ ㅉ ㄸ ㄲ ㅆ

Vo = ㅏ ㅑ ㅓ ㅕ ㅗ ㅛ ㅜ ㅠ ㅡ ㅣ ㅐ ㅒ ㅔ ㅖ ㅘ ㅙ ㅚ ㅝ ㅞ ㅟ ㅢ

;

Rules

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Return 이 after consonants"
%{이%}:이 <=> C: %>: _ ;

"Return 가 after consonants"
%{이%}:가 <=> Vo: %>: _ ;
